Massachusetts, session 194th, S1067.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 185C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 4 to 9, inclusive, the words “arising in the
city of Boston in the case of that division, in the counties of Berkshire, Franklin, Hampden and
Hampshire in the case of the western division and within the cities and towns included in the
Worcester county division, northeastern division and southeastern division, in the case of those
divisions,”
SECTION 2. Said section 3 of said chapter 185C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 34 to 38, inclusive, the words "in the city of Boston, in the case
of that division, Berkshire, Franklin, Hampden and Hampshire counties, in the case of the
western division and within the cities and towns included in the Worcester county division,
of 2

northeastern division and southeastern division, in the case of those "and inserting in place
thereof the following words: within their respective.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2